Utah statutes.
38-1-6.   Priority over claims of creditors of original contractor or subcontractor.

No attachment, garnishment or levy under an execution upon any money due to an original contractor from the owner of any property subject to lien under this chapter shall be valid as against any lien of a subcontractor or materialman, and no such attachment, garnishment or levy upon any money due to a subcontractor or materialman from the contractor shall be valid as against any lien of a laborer employed by the day or piece.

